California statutes. Elections Code
(e) A registered voter or any person who is eligible to vote, who qualifies as an authorized user pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), may use a signature stamp only after he or she first submits his or her affidavit of registration or a new affidavit of registration by one of the following means:

(1) Using the signature stamp to sign the affidavit in the presence of a county elections
 official.

(2) Submitting an affidavit pursuant to Section 2196 that utilizes a signature stamp that has been approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles and transmitted to the Secretary of State.

(f) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Authorized user” means either of the following:

(A) A person with a disability who, by reason of that disability, is unable to write and who owns a signature stamp.

(B) A person using the signature stamp on behalf of the owner of the stamp with the owner’s express consent and in the presence of the owner.

(2) “Disability” means a medical condition, mental
 disability, or physical disability, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (i), (j), and (l) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(3) “Signature stamp” means a stamp that contains the impression of any of the following:

(A) The actual signature of a person with a disability.

(B) A mark or symbol that is adopted by the person with the disability.

(C) A signature of the name of a person with a disability that is made by another person and is adopted by the person with the disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   (SB 111)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

“Software” includes all programs, voting devices, cards, ballot cards or papers, operating manuals or instructions, test procedures, printouts, and other nonmechanical or nonelectrical items necessary to the operation of a voting system.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

“Special election” is an election, the specific time for the holding of which is not prescribed by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

356.5.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 31.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

357.

“Statewide election” is an election held throughout the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

357.5.

“Vote center” means a location established for holding elections that offers the services described in Sections 2170 and 4005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 2.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

358.

“Vote tabulating device” means any piece of equipment, other than a voting machine, that compiles a total of votes cast by means of ballot card sorting, ballot card reading, paper ballot scanning, electronic data processing, or a combination of that type of equipment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

359.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

359.2.

“Voter list” means the list of registered voters in a single or consolidated precinct or in an entire county. The voter list may be in the form of a walking list, street index list, or other format, as provided by the elections official. The voter list is updated by the elections official with public information related to who has voted in an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 9.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

359.5.

(a) “Voter-nominated office” means a congressional or state elective office for which a candidate may choose to have his or her party preference or lack of party preference indicated upon the ballot. A political party or party central committee shall not nominate a candidate at a state-conducted primary election for a voter-nominated office. The primary conducted for a voter-nominated office does not serve to determine the nominees of a political party but serves to winnow the candidates for the general election to the candidates receiving the highest or second highest number of votes cast at the primary election. The following offices are voter-nominated offices:

(1) Governor.

(2) Lieutenant Governor.

(3) Secretary of State.

(4) Controller.

(5) Treasurer.

(6) Attorney General.

(7) Insurance Commissioner.

(8) Member of the State Board of Equalization.

(9) United States Senator.

(10) Member of the United States House of Representatives.

(11) State Senator.

(12) Member of the
 Assembly.

(b) This section does not prohibit a political party or party central committee from endorsing, supporting, or opposing a candidate for an office listed in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 4.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

360.

“Voting device” means any device used in conjunction with a ballot card or cards to indicate the choice of the voter by marking, punching, or slotting the ballot card.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

“Voting machine” means any electronic device, including, but not limited to, a precinct optical scanner and a direct recording voting system, into which a voter may enter his or her votes, and which, by means of electronic tabulation and generation of printouts or other tangible, human-readable records, furnishes a total of the number of votes cast for each candidate and for or against each measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 911, Sec. 1.   (AB 2631)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

“Voting system” means a mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic system and its software, or any combination of these used for casting a ballot, tabulating votes, or both. “Voting system” does not include a remote accessible vote by mail system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 4.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Elections in 2026 through 2029 [400. - 409.]

400.

This chapter applies to any regular or special election, beginning with the November 3, 2026, statewide general election, held in 2026 through 2029, inclusive, or proclaimed in 2029.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

All vote by mail ballot drop-off locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 30 days before the day of the election and continuing through and including the day of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

County election officials are encouraged to use public buildings for polling places.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

A law enforcement officer shall not arrest any person within 200 feet of a polling place on election day during the time in which the polling place is open, except for a crime related to disrupting the operation of the polling place, a crime against a person, or a crime against property. This section does not provide legal amnesty for any crime committed within the buffer zone on election day.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the prohibition on electioneering in subdivision (a) of Section 319.5 may be expanded by a county board of supervisors to up to 200 feet of either of the following:

(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.

(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.

(b) A violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor as provided in Section 18370 or 18371.

(c) If a county board of supervisors expands the area in which electioneering is prohibited pursuant to subdivision (a), the approved distance shall be uniform at every location described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) within the county.

(d) A county board of supervisors shall notify the Secretary of State if the board expands the area in which electioneering is prohibited pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

(a) A law enforcement officer shall abide by Sections 403 and 404 and subdivision (a) of Section 18370.

(b) A law enforcement officer shall notify the Secretary of State and Attorney General of a suspected, planned, or actual violation of Section 403 or 404 or subdivision (a) of Section 18370.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

To implement the requirements of this chapter, the state may place reasonable restrictions on a polling place located on state property, and a local government may place reasonable restrictions on a polling place located on local government property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14212, Section 4005, or any other law, on election day a county elections official may extend the time for closing the polls at any polling place if the county elections official determines, in consultation with the county counsel, in the official’s discretion, that voting at the polling place was disrupted as a result of a violation of Section 403 or 404 or subdivision (a) of Section 18370.

(b) If the time for closing the polls is extended pursuant to subdivision (a), all votes cast during the time that the closing of the polls is extended shall be by provisional ballot. Any provisional ballots cast pursuant to this subdivision shall be
 separated and held apart from other provisional ballots cast by voters prior to the time the closing of the polls was extended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 409.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 884)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5, commencing with Section 400.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. ESTABLISHED ELECTION DATES [1000. - 1500.]



CHAPTER 1. Election Dates [1000. - 1003.]

1000.

The established election dates are as follows:

(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in March of each even-numbered year that is evenly divisible by four.

(b) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in March of each odd-numbered year. 

(c) The second Tuesday of April in each even-numbered year.

(d) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in June in each even-numbered year that is not evenly divisible by four.

(e) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November
 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 111, Sec. 4.   (SB 970)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

The following are statewide elections and their dates are statewide election dates:

(a) An election held in November of an even-numbered year.

(b) An election held in June of an even-numbered year that is not evenly divisible by four and in March of each even-numbered year that is evenly divisible by four.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 111, Sec. 5.   (SB 970)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

Except as provided in Section 1003, notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all state, county, municipal, district, and school district elections shall be held on an established election date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

This chapter shall not apply to the following:

(a) Any special election called by the Governor.

(b) Elections held in chartered cities or chartered counties in which the charter provisions are inconsistent with this chapter.

(c) School governing board elections consolidated pursuant to Section 1302.2 or initiated by petition pursuant to Section 5091 of the Education Code.

(d) Elections of any kind required or permitted to be held by a school district located in a chartered city or county when the election is consolidated with a regular city or county election held in a jurisdiction that includes 95 percent or more of the school district’s population.

(e) County, municipal, district, and school district initiative, referendum, or recall elections.

(f) Any election conducted solely by mailed ballot pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000).

(g) Elections held pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 15100) of Chapter 1, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 15340) of Chapter 2 of, Part 10 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Election Day [1100. - 1100.]

1100.

No election shall be held on any day other than a Tuesday, nor shall any election be held on the day before, the day of, or the day after, a state holiday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 20.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Statewide Elections [1200. - 1202.]

1200.

The statewide general election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

The statewide direct primary shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June of each even-numbered year that is not evenly divisible by four and on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March in each even-numbered year that is evenly divisible by four.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 111, Sec. 6.   (SB 970)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

The presidential primary shall be consolidated with the statewide direct primary in any year that is evenly divisible by four, and the consolidated primary shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 111, Sec. 7.   (SB 970)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Local Elections [1300. - 1304.]

1300.

(a) (1) An election to select a district attorney and sheriff shall be held with the presidential primary.

(2) If the district attorney or sheriff is not elected pursuant to Sections 8140 and 8141, the election described in paragraph (1) shall be
 deemed a primary election and a county general election shall be held with the presidential general election to select the district attorney or sheriff.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and as otherwise provided in the Government Code, an election to select county officers
 other than district attorney and sheriff shall be held with the statewide primary at which candidates for Governor are nominated.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), and except as otherwise provided in the Government Code, a county board of supervisors may adopt an ordinance to hold
 an election to select any county officer other than a county superintendent of schools with the presidential primary.

(3) If a county officer described in this subdivision is not elected pursuant to Sections 8140 and 8141, the election held pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) shall be deemed a primary election and a county general election for the office shall be held with the following statewide general election.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1003 or any other law, the requirement that the district attorney and sheriff be elected in
 presidential election years applies to both general law and charter counties, except those charter counties that, on or before January 1, 2021, expressly specified in their charter when an election for district attorney or sheriff would occur.

(d) A district attorney or sheriff elected in 2022
 shall serve a six-year term and the next election for that office shall occur at the 2028 presidential primary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 743, Sec. 2.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

(a) Except as required by Section 57379 of the Government Code, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a general municipal election shall be held on an established election date pursuant to Section 1000.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a city council may enact an ordinance, pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 10000), requiring its general municipal election to be held on the day of the statewide direct primary election, the day of the statewide general election, the day of school district elections as set forth in Section 1302, the first Tuesday after the first Monday of March in each odd-numbered year, or the second Tuesday of April in each year. An ordinance adopted pursuant to
 this subdivision shall become operative upon approval by the county board of supervisors.

(2) In the event of consolidation, the general municipal election shall be conducted in accordance with all applicable procedural requirements of this code pertaining to that primary, general, or school district election, and shall thereafter occur in consolidation with that election.

(c) If a city adopts an ordinance described in subdivision (b), the municipal election following the adoption of the ordinance and each municipal election thereafter shall be conducted on the date specified by the city council, in accordance with subdivision (b), unless the ordinance in question is later repealed by the city council.

(d) If the date of a general municipal election is changed pursuant to subdivision (b), at least one election shall
 be held before the ordinance, as approved by the county board of supervisors, may be subsequently repealed or amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 83.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the regular election to select governing board members in any school district, community college district, or county board of education shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in Section 1302.5, after the initial election of governing board members in any school district, community college district, or of members of a county board of education, the election of governing board members for the district or of members of the county board of education may be established, upon the adoption of an appropriate resolution by the governing board or the county board of education, respectively, to regularly occur on the same day as the statewide direct primary election, the statewide general election, or the general municipal election as set forth in Section 1301. The resolution shall become operative upon approval by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 10404.5 or 10405.7, as applicable. If a school district, community college district, or county board of education is located in more than one county, the district may not consolidate an election if any county in which the district is located denies the request for consolidation.

(2) If the board of supervisors approves the resolution pursuant to Section 10404.5 or 10405.7, as applicable, the election of the governing board members of the school district or community college district or of members of the county board of education shall be conducted on the date specified by the board of supervisors, in accordance with paragraph (1), unless the approval is later rescinded by the board of supervisors.

(3) In the event of consolidation, the election of governing board members of the school district or community college district or of members of the county board of education shall be conducted in accordance with all applicable procedural requirements of the Elections Code pertaining to that primary, general, or municipal election, and shall thereafter occur in consolidation with that election.

(4) If the date of an election is changed pursuant to this section, at least one election shall be held before the resolution, as approved by the board of supervisors, may be subsequently repealed or amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 25.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.1.

In a community college district that includes the trustee areas authorized to be established pursuant to the second paragraph of Section 72022 of the Education Code, the consolidation of the election of trustees on the same date as the statewide general election pursuant to Section 1302 may be approved by any county or counties for the trustee areas located entirely within the county or counties. Approval by any county or counties in which the other trustee areas are located shall be deemed to meet the requirement of staggered terms set forth in Section 72022 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 26.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when an elementary, unified, high school, or community college district includes within its boundaries the same territory, or territory that is in part the same, as a chartered city, the governing board member elections of the elementary, unified, high school, or community college district may be consolidated with the city election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10. The consolidation shall be effected by the officer conducting the election having jurisdiction of the elementary, unified, high school, or community college district, upon the written request of the governing board of the elementary, unified, high school, or community college district and with the written consent of the legislative body of the city. This section shall control in the event of any conflict with a prior order of the county superintendent of schools made pursuant to Section 5340 of the Education Code.

(b) When a high school district or community college district election is consolidated with that of a city pursuant to this section, and the high school district or community college district has within its boundaries component districts whose elections would otherwise be held on a date specified in this code, the elections in the component districts may be consolidated with the election in the high school district or community college district. The consolidation shall be effected by the officer conducting the election having jurisdiction of the component districts upon the written request of the governing boards thereof and with the written consent of the governing boards of the districts whose governing board member elections are to be consolidated with those of the component districts.

(c) Successors to incumbents holding office upon the effective date of this section, who in the absence of this section would have been elected at a different time, shall be chosen for office at the election nearest the time the terms of office of the incumbents would have otherwise expired. If an incumbent’s term of office is extended because of this section, he or she shall hold office until a successor qualifies for the office, but in no event shall the term of an incumbent be extended to more than four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 27.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.3.

An annual election for members of the board of education shall be held in each unified district that is coterminous with or includes in its boundaries all or any portion of a chartered city or city and county the charter of which provides for a board of education, of five members with five-year terms, with the term of one member expiring each year. The election shall be held annually on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. The election shall be called by the county superintendent of schools and conducted in substantially the same manner as prescribed by Section 5000 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 28.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a regular election for members of the Long Beach Community College District governing board may be held, upon the adoption of an appropriate resolution by the governing board, on the same date upon which the election for members of the City Board of Education of the Long Beach Unified School District is held pursuant to the City Charter of the City of Long Beach and Article 3 (commencing with Section 5340) of Chapter 3 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 29.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon recommendation of the county superintendent of schools and with the approval of the county board of supervisors, the election of governing board members of school districts whose boundaries are coterminous with the boundaries of the county, shall be consolidated with the November general election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10.

(1) The terms of members of the governing board elected pursuant to this section shall begin at noon on the first Monday after the first day in January following the general election and shall end at noon on the first Monday after the first day in January four years thereafter.

(2) The terms of members of the governing board expiring on March 31 of any odd-numbered year next succeeding any general election shall expire at noon on the first Monday after the first day in January following the general election.

(b) When the term of an incumbent expires at midnight on March 31 of an odd-numbered year and no successor has been elected because of the provisions of subdivision (a), the members of the board whose terms have not expired shall appoint a successor to serve until a successor is elected and qualifies pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 30.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1303.

(a) Unless the principal act of a district provides that an election shall be held on one of the other dates specified in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 1, or except as provided in Section 1500, or except as provided in subdivision (b), a general district election to elect members of the governing board shall be held in each special district subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 10000) on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a governing body of a special district may require, by resolution, that its elections of governing body members be held on the same day as the statewide general election. The resolution shall become operative upon the approval of the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 10404.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 810, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1304.

Unless the principal act of a district provides that an election shall be held on one of the other dates specified in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 1, a general district election shall be held in each district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year to choose a successor for each elective officer the term of whose office will expire on the following first Friday in December.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Special Elections [1400. - 1415.]

1400.

Each special election shall be held on one of the established election dates set by this division or on the date of any statewide special election except as provided in Section 1003.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the election for a county initiative that qualifies pursuant to Section 9118 shall be held at the next statewide election occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election. The election for a municipal or district initiative that qualifies pursuant to Section 9215 or 9310 shall be held at the jurisdiction’s next regular election occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election.

(b) The governing body of a county, city, or district may call a special election for the purpose of submitting an initiative measure to the voters before the date on which the initiative
 measure would appear on the ballot pursuant to subdivision (a). If the governing body calls a special election pursuant to this subdivision, the election shall be held not less than 88 days nor more than 103 days after the order of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 748, Sec. 1.   (AB 765)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.

The election for a county or municipal referendum that qualifies pursuant to Section 9144 or 9237 shall be held at the jurisdiction’s next regular election occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election or at a special election called for that purpose not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 33.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1415.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a city or city and county charter proposal proposed by the governing body of a city or city and county on its own motion that qualifies pursuant to Section 9255 shall be submitted to the voters at the next established statewide general election pursuant to Section 1200 occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election.

(2) The governing body of a city or city and county may direct that either of the following be submitted to the voters at the next regularly scheduled general municipal election pursuant to Section 1301, or at any established statewide general or
 statewide primary election pursuant to Section 1200 or 1201, occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election:

(A) A charter proposal that proposes to amend a charter in a manner that does not alter any procedural or substantive protection, right, benefit, or employment status of any local government employee or retiree or of any local government employee organization.

(B) A charter proposal that proposes to amend a charter solely to comply with a court injunction or consent decree or with federal or state voting rights laws.

(b) A city or city and county charter proposal that proposes to amend or repeal
 a charter and is proposed by a petition signed by 15 percent of the registered voters of a city or 10 percent of the registered voters of a city and county, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 9255, shall be submitted to the voters at the next regularly scheduled general municipal election pursuant to Section 1301, or at any established statewide general or statewide primary election pursuant to Section 1200 or 1201, occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 311)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Mail Ballot Elections [1500. - 1500.]

1500.

The established mailed ballot election dates are as follows:

(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each year.

(b) The last Tuesday in August of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 1.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. VOTERS [2000. - 2700.]



CHAPTER 1. Voter Qualifications [2000. - 2053.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2000. - 2000.]

2000.

(a) Every person who qualifies under Section 2 of Article II of the California Constitution and who complies with this code governing the registration of electors may vote at any election held within the territory within which he or she resides and the election is held.

(b) Any person who will be at least 18 years of age at the time of the next election is eligible to register and vote at that election.

(c) Pursuant to Section 2102, any person who is at least 16 years of age and otherwise meets all eligibility requirements to vote is eligible to preregister to vote, but is not eligible to vote until
 he or she is 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Determination of Residence and Domicile [2020. - 2035.]

2020.

The term of domicile is computed by including the day on which the person’s domicile commenced and by excluding the day of the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2021.

(a) A person who leaves his or her home to go into another state or precinct in this state for temporary purposes merely, with the intention of returning, does not lose his or her domicile.

(b) A person does not gain a domicile in any precinct into which he or she comes for temporary purposes merely, without the intention of making that precinct his or her home.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

If a person moves to another state with the intention of making it his or her domicile, the voter loses his or her domicile in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2023.

If a person moves to another state as a place of permanent residence, with the intention of remaining there for an indefinite time, he or she loses his or her domicile in this state, notwithstanding that he or she intends to return at some future time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2024.

The mere intention to acquire a new domicile, without the fact of removal avails nothing, neither does the fact of removal without the intention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2025.

A person does not gain or lose a domicile solely by reason of his or her presence or absence from a place while employed in the service of the United States or of this state, nor while engaged in navigation, nor while a student of any institution of learning, nor while kept in an almshouse, asylum or prison. This section shall not be construed to prevent a student at an institution of learning from qualifying as an elector in the locality where he or she domiciles while attending that institution, when in fact the student has abandoned his or her former domicile.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2026.

The domicile of a Member of the Legislature or a Representative in the Congress of the United States shall be conclusively presumed to be at the residence address indicated on that person’s currently filed affidavit of
 registration, as long as the address is a residence under subdivision (c) of Section 349, notwithstanding that the member or representative may have another residence at which any of the following apply:

(a) A child for whom the member or representative is a parent, step-parent, foster parent, guardian, or caretaker is enrolled in school.

(b) The spouse, domestic partner, or intimate partner of the member or representative is located for employment.

(c) The member or representative receives mail or other postal or parcel deliveries.

(d) The member or representative owns, leases, or rents a dwelling.

(e) The member or representative claims a homeowner’s exemption or any other similar claim for tax purposes.

(f) The member or representative maintains accounts or pays for utilities, cable or satellite television, Internet service, home security service, home or landscape maintenance, or other similar services.

(g) The member or representative registers a vehicle or boat.

(h) The member or representative maintains policies of insurance.

(i) The member or representative has items of personal property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 911, Sec. 1.   (SB 1250)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2027.

The place where a person’s family is domiciled is his or her domicile unless it is a place for temporary establishment for his or her family or for transient objects.

Residence in a trailer or vehicle or at any public camp or camping ground may constitute a domicile for voting purposes if the registrant complies with the other requirements of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2028.
